Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 1 Codes of Ethics

45-10-1.
Code of ethics for government service generally — Establishment and text.

There is established for and within the state and for and in all governments therein a code of ethics for government service which shall read as follows:

CODE OF ETHICS FOR GOVERNMENT SERVICE

Any person in government service should:

I. Put loyalty to the highest moral principles and to country above loyalty to persons, party, or government department.

II. Uphold the Constitution, laws, and legal regulations of the United States and the State of Georgia and of all governments therein and never be a party to their evasion.

III. Give a full day’s labor for a full day’s pay and give to the performance of his duties his earnest effort and best thought.

IV. Seek to find and employ more efficient and economical ways of getting tasks accomplished.

V. Never discriminate unfairly by the dispensing of special favors or privileges to anyone, whether for remuneration or not, and never accept, for himself or his family, favors or benefits under circumstances which might be construed by reasonable persons as influencing the performance of his governmental duties.

VI. Make no private promises of any kind binding upon the duties of office, since a government employee has no private word which can be binding on public duty.

VII. Engage in no business with the government, either directly or indirectly, which is inconsistent with the conscientious performance of his governmental duties.

VIII. Never use any information coming to him confidentially in the performance of governmental duties as a means for making private profit.

IX. Expose corruption wherever discovered.

X. Uphold these principles, ever conscious that public office is a public trust.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1369.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

For article, “Georgia’s New Ethics Laws: A Summary of the Changes Relevant to Lobbyists and Legislators,” see 11 Ga. St. B. J. 22 (No. 4, 2005).

45-10-2.
Secretary of State to print and distribute code of ethics.

The Secretary of State is authorized and directed to have the code of ethics for government service established in Code Section 45-10-1 printed upon an appropriately designed card which would be suitable for framing and exhibiting to the public and employees of the state and all governments therein.

The Secretary of State is authorized and directed to have such number of said code of ethics for government service printed as, in his discretion, will be sufficient for distribution to the various departments, boards, bureaus, and other agencies of the state and all governments therein.

The Secretary of State is authorized and directed to furnish said printed code of ethics for government service to the various departments, boards, bureaus, and other agencies of the state and all governments therein without cost.

The expenses incurred by the Secretary of State in carrying out this Code section shall be paid from the funds appropriated to or otherwise available to the legislative branch of government.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 1369.

45-10-3.
Code of ethics for members of boards, commissions, and authorities — Establishment and text.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, each member of all boards, commissions, and authorities created by general statute shall:

Uphold the Constitution, laws, and regulations of the United States, the State of Georgia, and all governments therein and never be a party to their evasion;

Never discriminate by the dispensing of special favors or privileges to anyone, whether or not for remuneration;

Not engage in any business with the government, either directly or indirectly, which is inconsistent with the conscientious performance of his governmental duties;

Never use any information coming to him confidentially in the performance of governmental duties as a means for making private profit;

Expose corruption wherever discovered;

Never solicit, accept, or agree to accept gifts, loans, gratuities, discounts, favors, hospitality, or services from any person, association, or corporation under circumstances from which it could reasonably be inferred that a major purpose of the donor is to influence the performance of the member’s official duties;

Never accept any economic opportunity under circumstances where he knows or should know that there is a substantial possibility that the opportunity is being afforded him with intent to influence his conduct in the performance of his official duties;

Never engage in other conduct which is unbecoming to a member or which constitutes a breach of public trust; and

Never take any official action with regard to any matter under circumstances in which he knows or should know that he has a direct or indirect monetary interest in the subject matter of such matter or in the outcome of such official action.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 344, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

For article, “The Status of Administrative Agencies under the Georgia Constitution,” 40 Ga. L. Rev. 1109 (2006).

45-10-4.
Code of ethics for members of boards, commissions, and authorities — Hearing; notice; removal of member from office; filling vacancies; judicial review.

Upon formal charges being filed with the Governor relative to a violation of Code Section 45-10-3 on the part of a member of any such board, commission, or authority, the Governor or his designated agent shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of receiving evidence relative to the merits of such charges. The member so charged shall be given at least 30 days’ notice prior to such hearing. If such charges are found to be true, the Governor shall forthwith remove such member from office and the vacancy shall be filled as provided by law. Such hearing shall be held in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and judicial review of any such decision shall be in accordance with such chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 344, § 3.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).

45-10-5.
Authority to enact rules and regulations.

No member of any board, commission, or authority created by general statute shall enact any rules or regulations or publicize such as being general laws and such rules and regulations shall in no way have the effect of law.

History.

Ga. L. 1976, p. 344, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article, “Conflicts of Interests of Public Officers and Employees,” see 13 Ga. St. B.J. 64 (1976).